Tennessee statutes. Title 63 Professions Of The Healing Arts
Part 1 General Provisions
63-7-129. Use of title “nurse”.

Notwithstanding any provision of any title to the contrary, a person shall not use the title “nurse” or any other title, abbreviation, or designation in connection with the person's name, occupation, or profession to indicate or imply that the person is a practicing nurse unless the person is actively licensed or certified by the board of nursing.

Acts 2019, ch. 245, § 1.

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 245, § 3. May 2, 2019.